Utah statutes.
10-2-701.5.   Form of petition.

A petition for municipal disincorporation shall substantially comply with, and be circulated in, the following form:  PETITION FOR MUNICIPAL DISINCORPORATION

To the Honorable District Court of ____ County, Utah:

We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of Utah, and residents of ____ City, Utah, respectfully petition the Court to submit a proposal to disincorporate ____ City, Utah, to the legal voters resident within said city for their approval or rejection at a special election ordered held by the court for that purpose; and each signator for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Utah; I am a resident of ____ City, Utah, and my residence and post office address are correctly written after my name.

